Alabama, session 2026rs, HB134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-38-71.01, Code of Alabama 1975,
is amended to read as follows:
"§45-38-71.01
(a) This section shall only apply in Lamar County.
(b)(1) All contracts for the sale or disposal of real
property, or tangible personal property, equipment, or other
items owned by or under the control of the county commission
shall be let by free and open competitive sealed bids. The
chair of the county commission shall certify to the
description and condition of the property, shall give
jurisdiction in writing for the disposal of the property,
shall estimate the value of the property, and shall keep the
certification as a part of the permanent record of the
commission. Tangible personal property, equipment, or other
items owned by or under the control of the county commission
which have has trade-in value may be offered as a credit
against the cost of property purchased in accordance with the
Alabama Competitive Bid Law Article 3 of Chapter 16 of Title
41.
Page 1

41.
HB134 Enrolled
(2) Every proposal to make a sale covered by this
section shall be publicly advertised for four two consecutive
weeks in a newspaper of countywide circulation and advertised
one time in a newspaper of statewide circulation not less than
seven days in advance of the date fixed for closing the
receipt of bids. The advertisements shall state a description
of the property to be sold along with the date, time, and
place of opening of the sealed bids.
(c) All bids shall be publicly opened and all bidders
shall be entitled to be present at the bid opening in person
or by representative. Any agreement or collusion among bidders
or prospective bidders or any other person in restraint of
freedom of competition, by any agreement to bid at a fixed
price or to refrain from bidding, shall render the bids of the
bidders void and shall cause such bidders to be disqualified
from submitting further bids on the sale. Any disclosure prior
to opening the sealed bids or the terms of a bid shall render
the proceedings void.
(d) In lieu of the bidding procedures provided in
subsections (b) and (c), tangible personal property,
equipment, or other items owned by or under the control of the
county commission may be sold at a public auction, whether in
person or online, by public bidding once a year. The county
shall publicly advertise for two consecutive weeks in advance
the date, time, and location of the auction shall be publicly
advertised for four consecutive weeks in advance of the
auction. If the auction is online, the county is not required
to publicly advertise the auction. A list of the items to be
Page 2

to publicly advertise the auction. A list of the items to be
HB134 Enrolled
auctioned shall be available in the offices of the county
commission.
(e) All proceeds from the sale or other disposition of
the property under this section shall be deposited in the fund
of the district owning the property or the general fund of the
county, if the property was owned by the county.
(f) Anyone who knowingly violates this section shall be
guilty of a Class B felony and upon conviction shall be fined
up to fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) and may be imprisoned
in the state penitentiary for up to seven years.
(g)(f) Any taxpayer of the area within the jurisdiction
of the county and any bona fide unsuccessful bidder on a
particular contract may bring a civil action in the
appropriate court to enjoin execution of any contract entered
into in violation of this section."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 3

2026.
HB134 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 20-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk

100
101
102
103
104 Senate 22-Jan-26 Passed
105
106
107
Page 4